Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 119 Election Offenses and Prosecutions

119.005.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

A “ballot” or “official ballot” means the official presentation of offices and candidates to be voted for, including write-in candidates, and all public questions submitted for determination, and shall include a voting machine ballot, a paper ballot, an absentee ballot, a special ballot, a federal provisional ballot, a federal provisional absentee ballot, or a supplemental paper ballot which has been authorized for the use of the voters in any primary or regular or special election by the Secretary of State or the county clerk;

“Ballot box” means any box, bag, or other container that can be locked, sealed, or otherwise rendered tamper-resistant, for receiving ballots;

“Election officer” has the same meaning as in KRS

118.015

;

“Voting equipment” means any physical component of a voting system and includes voting machines where voting machines are in operation;

“Voting machine” or “machine” means a part of a voting system that consists of:

A direct recording electronic voting machine that:

Records votes by means of a ballot display provided with mechanical or electro-operated components that may be actuated by the voter;

Processes the data by means of a computer program;

Records voting data and ballot images in internal and external memory components; and

Produces a tabulation of the voting data stored in a removable memory component and on a printed copy; or

One (1) or more electronic devices that operate independently or as a combination of a ballot-marking device and an electronic or automatic vote-tabulating device; and

“Voting system” means:

The total combination of physical, mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic equipment, including the software, hardware, firmware, and documentation required to program, control, and support that equipment, that is used to:

Define ballots;

Cast and count votes;

Report or display election results; and

Maintain and produce any audit trail information; and

The practices and associated documentation used to:

Identify system components and versions of those components;

Test the system during its development and maintenance;

Maintain records of system errors and defects;

Determine specific system changes to be made to a system after the initial qualification of the system; and

Make available any materials to the voter, such as notices, instructions, forms, or paper ballots.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 360, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 2020 ch. 89, § 30, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 197, § 63, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 24, effective April 7, 2022.

119.010.
Definition
of “political party.” [Repealed.]

119.015.
Clerk
making or permitting wrongful registration, or failing or refusing to deliver
copies of registration records.

Any county clerk or deputy county
clerk who falsely or fraudulently registers the name of any person, or permits
any person to register knowing that the person is not entitled to register,
or who fails or refuses to deliver copies of the registration records to a
person entitled thereto, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 63; 1990, ch. 48, § 64, effective July 13, 1990.

119.020.
Political
parties must nominate candidates by primary — Exceptions — Vacancy
in nomination. [Repealed.]

119.025.
Wrongful
registration.

Any person who knowingly or
fraudulently causes himself to be registered in more than one (1) precinct,
or to be registered more than once, or in a precinct other than the one in
which he is a legal voter, or who registers under any name other than his
real name, or who gives a false address, or who in any manner causes himself
to be registered when he is not legally entitled to register, or who makes
a false oath as to his ability to read or write, or who knowingly or fraudulently
aids, abets, counsels or advises in the commission of any such act, shall
be subject to the penalties prescribed for Class D felonies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 64; 1990, ch. 48, § 65, effective July 13, 1990.

119.030.
Unexpired
terms — Nominations for. [Repealed.]

119.035.
Alteration,
suppression, mutilation, or destruction of registration record — Making
or using false or fraudulent record.

Any person who fraudulently
or unlawfully alters any registration record, or fraudulently adds any name
thereto, or willfully secretes, suppresses, mutilates or destroys any registration
record, or makes or uses any false or fraudulent registration record, and
any person who aids or abets in the commission of such act, shall be subject
to the penalties prescribed for Class D felonies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 65; 1990, ch. 48, § 66, effective July 13, 1990.

119.040.
Time
and place of holding primary. [Repealed.]

119.045.
Interfering
with registration.

Any person who attempts to or
forcibly prevents any person from registering, or in any way unlawfully interferes
with any person registering, or prevents or interferes with a clerk or registration
officer in carrying out his duties with relation to the registration of voters,
shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 66; 1990, ch. 48, § 67, effective July 13, 1990.

119.050.
Qualifications
for nomination — Form of nomination papers. [Repealed.]

119.055.
Procedure
for candidate to get name on primary ballot. [Repealed.]

119.056.
Alteration,
mutilation, or suppression of nomination papers.

Any person in possession of nomination papers for attaining ballot access entitled to be filed under the statutes relating to primaries, regular and special elections who wrongfully alters, mutilates or suppresses such papers, or wrongfully fails to cause them to be filed at the proper time in the proper office, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 67; 1990, ch. 48, § 68, effective July 13, 1990; 2008, ch. 79, § 9, effective July 15, 2008.

119.060.
“Dummy”
candidates prohibited. [Repealed.]

119.065.
Forgery
of nomination papers.

Any person who forges the name
of a signer to a nomination paper shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 68; 1990, ch. 48, § 69, effective July 13, 1990.

119.070.
Special
provisions for nomination of candidates for judicial offices. [Repealed.]

119.075.
Special
provisions for nomination of candidates serving in armed forces. [Repealed.]

119.076.
Clerk’s
failure to place candidate’s name on ballot.

Any county clerk who willfully
and knowingly refuses or fails to have the name of any candidate printed upon
the official ballot in the manner provided by law shall be guilty of a Class
D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 69; 1990, ch. 48, § 70, effective July 13, 1990.

119.080.
Where
and when nomination paper to be filed. [Repealed.]

119.085.
Challenging
good faith of candidate. [Repealed.]

119.086.
Clerk’s
failure to use proper paper for ballots. [Repealed.]

119.090.
Unopposed
candidate entitled to certificate of nomination. [Repealed.]

119.095.
Printer’s
violation of duty in printing ballots.

Any printer of ballots, or person
employed in printing ballots, who prints or permits to be printed any ballot
in any other form than the one prescribed by law, or with any name or device
placed, spelled or arranged thereon other than as authorized and directed
by the county clerk, or who gives or delivers, or knowingly permits to be
taken, any ballot by any person other than the county clerk for whom the ballots
are being printed, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 71; 1990, ch. 48, § 71, effective July 13, 1990.

119.100.
Inspection
of nomination papers. [Repealed.]

119.105.
Removal
or destruction of election supplies or booths.

Any person who steals or willfully destroys any of the election supplies required to be furnished by the county clerk shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200), and imprisoned in the county jail for not less than one (1) month nor more than six (6) months.

Any person who, during an election, knowingly and willfully removes or defaces the cards printed for the instruction of the voters, or destroys or removes any booth or other convenience provided for the election, or induces or attempts to induce any person to commit any such act, shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than six (6) months nor more than one (1) year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 72.

119.110.
When
nomination papers to be destroyed. [Repealed.]

119.115.
Unauthorized possession of key to voting machine, equipment, or system — Tampering with, injuring, or destroying ballots, machines, equipment, or systems.

Any unauthorized person found in possession of any key to a voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system to be used or being used in any primary, regular election, or special election shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who, during or before any primary, regular election, or special election, willfully tampers with or attempts to tamper with, disarrange, deface, or impair in any manner whatsoever, injures, or destroys any ballot, or destroys any voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system while in use at an election or at any other time, or who shall, after such voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system is locked and sealed in order to preserve the record of the vote, tamper with or attempt to tamper with the record of the vote, or who aids or abets with intent to destroy or change the record of the vote shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any election official, or other person entrusted with the custody or control of any voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system shall be guilty of a Class D felony if he or she knowingly and intentionally:

Causes or permits any voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system to fail to correctly register or count votes cast, tampers with or disarranges such voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system in any way;

Unlawfully opens a voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system;

Prevents or attempts to prevent the correct operation of a voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system;

Causes a voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system to be used or consents to its being used for any election with knowledge of the fact that the voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system is not in order, or not perfectly set and adjusted to correctly register all votes cast;

Removes, changes, or mutilates any ballot; or

Directly connects or attempts to directly connect a voting machine, voting equipment, or voting system that tabulates or aggregates votes to a public network, including the Internet, at any time.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 277, § 1; 1984, ch. 111, § 65, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 48, § 72, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 463, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 197, § 64, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 87, § 21, effective April 7, 2022.

119.120.
Register
of candidates. [Repealed.]

119.125.
Sheriff’s
failure to hold election or perform other election duties.

Any sheriff who willfully fails
to cause an election to be held, as required by law, shall be fined not less
than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).
Any sheriff who willfully fails to perform any other duty concerning an election,
for which there is no penalty specifically prescribed, shall be fined not
less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200).

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 73.

119.130.
Certification
of candidates by Secretary of State — Order of listing county officers.
[Repealed.]

119.135.
Election
officer’s failure to perform duty. [Repealed.]

119.140.
Order
of names on ballot — How determined. [Repealed.]

119.145.
Election
officer’s refusal to admit challenger.

Any election officer who refuses
to permit any challenger of any political party having a ticket to be voted
for at an election, who has been duly appointed and presents a duly attested
certificate of appointment, to perform his duties as challenger, shall be
fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars
($500).

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 75.

119.150.
Order
of offices on ballot. [Repealed.]

119.155.
Preventing
voter from casting ballot — Interfering with election.

Any person who unlawfully prevents or attempts to prevent any voter from casting his ballot, or intimidates or attempts to intimidate any voter so as to prevent him from casting his ballot, or who unlawfully interferes with the election officers in the discharge of their duties, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who, by himself or in aid of others, forcibly breaks up or prevents, or attempts to break up or prevent, or obstructs or attempts to obstruct, the lawful holding of an election, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 76; 1990, ch. 48, § 73, effective July 13, 1990.

119.160.
Clerk’s
duties in regard to placing names on ballots. [Repealed.]

119.165.
False
personation of a voter — Nonresident or unqualified person voting.

Any person who falsely personates a registered voter, and receives and casts a ballot by means of such personation, shall be guilty of a Class D felony. An attempt at such personation shall constitute a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who, by means other than falsely personating a registered voter, votes at an election in this state when he is a resident of another state or country, or votes more than once at an election, or votes by use of the naturalization papers of another person, shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Any person who knowingly votes or attempts to vote in a precinct other than the one in which he resides shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, unless by voting in a precinct in which he does not live he is enabled to vote in a race or on a matter in which he could not vote in his proper precinct in which case he shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Any person who lends or hires his or another’s naturalization papers to be used for the purpose of voting shall be subject to the same penalty.

Any resident of this state who, by means other than falsely personating a registered voter, votes at a regular or special election before he has resided in this state thirty (30) days, or in the county and precinct where the election is held the time required by law, or before he has attained full age, or before he has become a citizen, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any person who, by means other than falsely personating a registered voter, votes in a primary election knowing that he is not qualified as provided in KRS

116.055

, shall be guilty of a violation.

Any person who applies for or receives a ballot at any voting place other than the one at which he is entitled to vote, under circumstances not constituting a violation of any of the provisions of subsections (1) to (4) of this section, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 77; 1990, ch. 48, § 74, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 463, § 12, effective July 14, 1992.

119.170.
Court
may compel compliance with law as to placing names on ballots. [Repealed.]

119.175.
Receipt
of illegal vote or rejection of legal vote by election officer.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any officer of election who receives, assents to receive or records a vote at an election at a time or place known by him not to be the time and place lawfully appointed, or who knowingly receives the vote of any person other than a qualified voter, or refuses to receive the vote of a qualified voter, shall, for each offense, be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and shall forfeit any office he holds and be disqualified from ever holding any office.

Any judge of a primary election who knowingly receives a vote of an elector who is not qualified to vote in the primary election under KRS

116.055

shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 78.

119.180.
Form
of ballots — Sample ballots. [Repealed.]

119.185.
Disobeying
election officer’s command.

Any person who willfully disobeys
any lawful command of an election officer, given in the execution of his duty
as such at an election, shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25)
nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 79.

119.190.
Publication
of names of candidates by county clerk. [Repealed.]

119.195.
Removing
or tampering with ballots.

Any person who, during an election, knowingly and willfully removes or attempts to remove an official ballot from the election room, or has in his possession outside the election room any official ballot, either genuine or counterfeit, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any voter who attempts to leave the election room with an official ballot in his possession shall at once be arrested on demand of either of the judges of election and shall be guilty of a violation, unless the act was done knowingly in which event he shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who takes or removes in any manner, feloniously or with the consent or permission of the custodian, any official ballot from any place where it may lawfully be, or knowingly and willfully has in his possession or custody any such official ballot, except as an officer or custodian under the law or while within the polling place for the purpose of voting, and any custodian or officer who permits any official ballot to be removed or carried away from the place where it may lawfully be by any person other than the officer or custodian whose duty it is to receive it, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

Any election officer, or other person entrusted with the custody or control of any official ballot, either before or after it has been voted, who in any way marks, mutilates, or defaces any official ballot or places any distinguishing mark thereon, for the purpose of vitiating the official ballot, shall be guilty of a Class C felony.

Any person who unlawfully destroys or attempts to destroy any official ballot box used, or any official ballot deposited, at any election, or who unlawfully, by force, fraud, or other improper means, obtains or attempts to obtain possession of any ballot box or any official ballot therein deposited, while the voting at any election is going on or before the official ballots are duly taken out and counted according to law, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any election officer who mutilates or tampers with any of the seals, or destroys or removes any official ballots required to be preserved, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any county clerk who knowingly and willfully opens any ballot box and removes any official ballot therefrom, or removes, destroys, or tampers with a ballot box and official ballots left in his care and custody, or permits any other person to do so, during the period the boxes are required to remain locked in his office, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who removes, mutilates, or destroys, or adds any new official ballots to, the regular official ballots that have been counted and prepared for preservation, or that have already been preserved, so that the result of the election in the precinct or county is changed, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who tampers with or changes the official ballots, or opens the receptacles in which the official ballots are contained without the order of the court, after the ballots have been sent to the Franklin County courthouse in connection with the contest of a constitutional amendment, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 80; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 14; 1990, ch. 48, § 75, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 463, § 13, effective July 14, 1992.

119.200.
Qualifications
of voters. [Repealed.]

119.205.
Making or receiving expenditures for vote, for withholding of vote, or for signing a petition to have public question on ballot — Definition of “expenditure” — Procedures for paying for transportation of voters — Applicability of KRS 502.020.

Any person who makes or offers to make an expenditure to any person, either to vote or withhold his vote, or to vote for or against any candidate or public question at an election shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who solicits, accepts, or receives any such expenditure as payment or consideration for his vote, or the withholding of his vote, or to vote for or against any candidate or public question at an election shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who makes or offers to make an expenditure to any person to sign a petition to have a public question placed on the ballot, or any person who solicits, accepts, or receives any such expenditure as payment or consideration to sign a petition to have a public question placed on the ballot, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

For purposes of this section, “expenditure” means any of the following when intended as payment or consideration for voting or withholding a vote, voting for or against any candidate or public question, or signing a petition to have a public question placed on the ballot:

A payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value; or

A contract, promise, or agreement, express or implied, whether or not legally enforceable, to make a payment, distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value.

“Expenditure,” as used in this section, shall not include the distribution of materials bearing the name, likeness, or other identification of a candidate, political party, committee, or organization, or position on a public question and not intended as payment or consideration for voting or withholding a vote, voting for or against any candidate or public question, or signing a petition to have a public question placed on the ballot.

Any candidate or committee, or any person on his behalf, who pays any person, including campaign workers, for transporting voters to the polls on the day of the election, shall make all payments by check. All payments, regardless of amount, shall be reported to the Registry of Election Finance in the manner that the Registry shall provide by administrative regulation. Any person who knowingly violates any requirement of this subsection shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

In addition to the above provisions, a person may be convicted of a violation of this section pursuant to KRS

502.020

.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 1, effective February 15, 1991; 2000, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

119.207.
Prohibition against paying compensation based upon number or characteristics of voters registered.

Any person who provides compensation or makes any such expenditure as payment or consideration for registering voters that is based upon the total number of voters a person registers or the total number of voters a person registers in a particular party, political group, political organization, or voters of independent status shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 107, § 1, effective March 30, 2006.

119.210.
Challengers.
[Repealed.]

119.215.
Providing another with intoxicants on election day. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 82; 2013, ch. 121, § 99, effective June 25, 2013; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

119.220.
Manner
of issuing, marking and casting ballots. [Repealed.]

119.225.
Denial
of rights of inspectors by county board of elections.

Any member of a county board
of elections who refuses to permit an inspector designated under KRS

117.275

and

117.315

to exercise free and full action in witnessing the count of the
ballots, or interferes with the right of such an inspector to have a free
and full opportunity to witness the count of the ballots, shall be guilty
of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 83; 1982, ch. 394, § 35, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 48, § 77, effective July 13, 1990.

119.230.
Canvassing
returns — Issuance of certificates of nomination. [Repealed.]

119.235.
Alteration,
suppression, or destruction of stub book, return, or certificate of election.

Any person who willfully alters,
obliterates, secretes, suppresses or destroys a stub book, return or certificate
of election, and any officer who makes, aids in making or authorizes the making
of any false or fraudulent stub book, certificate of election or election
return, shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 84; 1990, ch. 48, § 78, effective July 13, 1990.

119.240.
Plurality
of votes nominates candidate. [Repealed.]

119.245.
Violation
of law or failure to perform duty by member of board of elections.

Any member of the State Board
of Elections or of a county board of elections who willfully and knowingly
violates any provision of the statutes relating to his duties, or fails to
execute faithfully any of the duties imposed upon him by law, for which no
other penalty is provided, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 85; 1982, ch. 394, § 36, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 48, § 79, effective July 13, 1990.

119.250.
County
clerk’s fees. [Repealed.]

119.255.
Intimidation
of election officer or board of elections.

Any person who, by threat of
violence or in any other manner, intimidates or attempts to intimidate the
election officers, the State Board of Elections or a county board of elections
in the performance of their duty and any persons who conspire together and
go forth armed for the purpose of intimidating said officers, shall be guilty
of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 86; 1982, ch. 394, § 37, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 48, § 80, effective July 13, 1990.

119.260.
Regular
election laws apply to primaries. [Repealed.]

119.265.
Violation
of duties for which no other penalty provided.

Any public officer who willfully
neglects to perform a duty imposed upon him under the election laws, for which
no other penalty is provided, or who willfully performs such duty in a way
that hinders the objects of the election laws, shall be guilty of a Class
B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 87; 1990, ch. 48, § 81, effective July 13, 1990.

119.275.
Advising
or assisting violation of election laws.

Any person who counsels, advises,
procures or aids in the commission of any of the offenses named in this chapter
shall incur the penalty provided for committing such offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 88.

119.277.
Prohibitions
against holding elective office.

Any person who shall have been
convicted of any election law offense which is a Class A misdemeanor shall
not be permitted to hold elective office for a period of five (5) years following
the conviction. Any person who shall have been convicted of any election law
offense which is a felony shall not be permitted to hold elective office until
his civil rights have been restored by executive pardon.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 17, effective July 15, 1988.

119.285.
Irregularity
or defect in conduct of election no defense.

Irregularities or defects in
the mode of convening or conducting an election shall constitute no defense
to a prosecution for a violation of the election laws.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 89.

119.295.
Applicability
of penalties for regular elections to primaries and to elections for United
States Senator.

Any act or deed denounced by the statutes concerning regular elections or concerning elections generally shall be an offense when committed in connection with a primary election held under KRS Chapter 118, and shall be punished in the same manner, and all the penalties for violation of the regular election laws shall apply with equal force to all similar violations of the provisions of the statutes relating to primary elections.

Penalties prescribed for offenses against the election laws in the election of other officers shall apply to elections for United States Senator.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 90.

119.305.
Report
by election officers of violations — Arrest of offenders.

Election officers shall give
information of all infractions of the election laws to the grand jury, Commonwealth’s
attorney, Attorney General and the Registry of Election Finance. The election
officers shall cooperate in any investigation or prosecution of election law
violations. When there is reason to fear that an offender will escape out
of the county before indictment, any election officer may procure his immediate
apprehension.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 91; 1988, ch. 341, § 38, effective July 15, 1988.

119.307.
Report
to grand jury on election officials inexcusably absent — Subject to
prosecution.

The county board of elections
shall present to the grand jury next convening subsequent to each election
the names of those election officials who failed to appear and serve at the
election and who had not been properly excused. Any such person may be subpoenaed
and inquiry made of his absence, and if no good cause be shown, he shall be
subject to prosecution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 341, § 18, effective July 15, 1988.

119.310.
Persons
entitled to have name placed on ballot for regular election. [Repealed.]

119.315.
Grand
jury may compel testimony as to violation of election laws.

Except as provided in KRS

119.325

,
any person who refuses, when summoned, to testify on oath before a grand jury
as to any knowledge he may possess concerning any violation of law in relation
to elections in the county during the preceding eighteen (18) months shall
be imprisoned until he submits, and be fined not less than ten dollars ($10)
nor more than thirty dollars ($30) by the court, and a like sum for each daily
repetition of the contempt.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 92.

119.320.
Nomination
for regular election by petition. [Repealed.]

119.325.
Refusal
to produce evidence of corrupt practices when summoned by grand jury a Class
A misdemeanor.

Any person having the possession
of any books, correspondence or papers of a corporation that may show or tend
to show any violation of the provisions of KRS

121.025

, or of KRS

121.045

or

121.055

, or of subsection (1) of KRS

121.310

, who refuses, when summoned
by a grand jury, to produce such books, correspondence or papers, or to appear
and testify concerning them or to give any other evidence material to the
matter under investigation, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 93; 1990, ch. 48, § 82, effective July 13, 1990.

119.330.
Nomination
by minor political parties, and by major political parties for certain offices.
[Repealed.]

119.335.
Evidence
required to support conviction for violation of election laws.

No person shall be convicted
of a violation of any of the statutes relating to elections upon the testimony
of only one (1) witness, unless sustained by strong corroborating circumstances.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 94.

119.340.
Effect
of conflicting certificates and petitions of nomination. [Repealed.]

119.345.
Witness
not exempted from giving incriminating testimony — Immunity except from
perjury charge.

At the discretion of the prosecuting attorney, in any prosecution under the election laws it shall be no exemption for a witness that his information may criminate himself, and no such information given by a witness shall be used against him in any prosecution, except for perjury, and if used on behalf of the Commonwealth he shall stand discharged from all penalties for any violation of the election laws so necessarily disclosed in the information he so discloses as tending to convict the accused.

The statement of any person testifying in any case pending under the provisions of KRS

121.025

,

121.045

,

121.055

, or subsection (1) of KRS

121.310

shall not be used against him in any prosecution or civil proceeding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 95; 1988, ch. 341, § 39, effective July 15, 1988.

119.350.
Defeated
primary candidate barred from having name on regular election ballot —
Exception for judicial candidate. [Repealed.]

119.355.
Limitation
of prosecutions.

No prosecution shall be had
under the election laws where the penalty is less than confinement in the
penitentiary unless the prosecution is commenced within two (2) years from
the time of the commission of the offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 96.

119.360 to 119.990.
Certificates of nomination — Vacancies — Names on ballot — Constitutional amendments — Penalties. [Repealed.]